Hawaii, session 2026, HB2246.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that federal agricultural grants provide financial support to Hawaii's agricultural industry.  The department of agriculture and biosecurity actively pursues these federal grants and has recently hired a grant writer, whose efforts have yielded great results.  Since November 2024, $8,899,450.16 in federal grant funds have been obtained from the United States Department of Agriculture and another $5,285,000 in grants have applications in process.  Many of the federal grants being pursued by the department provide for indirect overhead reimbursements or an allowable management fee to reimburse the State for costs associated with management of certain federal grants. The legislature further finds that the establishment of a formal agricultural grant program and a revolving fund would allow the department of agriculture and biosecurity to retain these funds and cover a portion of the program costs.  Funds from the revolving fund would be used to search for additional grant opportunities, develop program applications to monitor grant execution, ensure compliance with grant requirements, and audit grant expenditures.  Moneys in the fund will also be used for consultant services and operational expenses. The purpose of this Act is to: (1)  Establish an agricultural grant program in the department of agriculture and biosecurity and an agricultural grant revolving fund; and (2)  Appropriate funds out of the agricultural grant revolving fund for the agricultural grant program. SECTION 2.  Chapter 141, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding two new sections to part I to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§141-A Agricultural grant program; established.  (a)  There is established in the department of agriculture and biosecurity an agricultural grant program to search for, apply for, and administer federal agricultural grant opportunities that could benefit the Hawaii agricultural industry. (b)  The department of agriculture and biosecurity may retain and expend federal indirect overhead reimbursements for grants as determined by the chairperson of the board of agriculture and biosecurity. §141-B  Agricultural grant revolving fund.  (a) There is established in the state treasury an agricultural grant revolving fund into which shall be deposited the department of agriculture and biosecurity's share of federal indirect overhead reimbursements, pursuant to section 141-A. (b)  Moneys in the agricultural grant revolving fund shall be expended by the department of agriculture and biosecurity to search for discretionary grants, develop program applications to secure additional revenues for the department of agriculture and biosecurity, monitor grant execution, ensure compliance with grant requirements, and audit grant expenditures.  Moneys in the revolving fund may be expended for consultant services and operational expenses, including the hiring of temporary staff. (c)  The department of agriculture and biosecurity shall prepare and submit an annual report on the status of federal agricultural grants revolving fund to the legislature no later than twenty days prior to the convening of each regular session.  The annual report shall include but not be limited to a list federal agricultural grant applications submitted and grant awards received." SECTION 3.  There is appropriated out of the agricultural grant revolving fund the sum of $           or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the agricultural grant program. The sum appropriated shall be expended by the department of agriculture and biosecurity for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 4.  In codifying the new sections added by section 2 of this Act, the revisor of statutes shall substitute appropriate section numbers for the letters used in designating the new sections in this Act. SECTION 5.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 6.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 3000.